District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.12

Discharge of teacher.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent the discharge of any teacher at any time in the discretion of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia under the provisions of law.

Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 881, ch. 779, § 12

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1234.
1973 Ed., § 31-732.

Prior Codifications